Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
DEFINITIONS AND GENERAL PROVISIONS

§342H-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Complaint" means any written charge
filed with or by the department that a person is violating any provision of
this chapter or any rule or order adopted pursuant to this chapter.

"Department" means the department of
health.

"Director" means the director of
health.

"Disposal" means the discharge,
deposit, injection, dumping, spilling, leaking, or placing of any solid waste
onto any land or water so that such solid waste, or any constituent thereof,
may enter the environment, be emitted into the air, or discharged into any
water, including ground waters.

"Incineration" means the treatment of
solid waste by burning in a furnace designed for the purpose wherein solid
waste is essentially reduced to ash, carbon dioxide, and water vapor.

"Inert fill material" means earth,
soil, rocks, rock-like material such as cured asphalt, brick, and clean
concrete less than eight inches in diameter, except as specified by a licensed
soils engineer with no exposed steel reinforcing rod. The fill material shall
not contain vegetation or organic material, or other solid waste.

"Open dump" means a disposal site
that is operating in nonconformance with applicable standards, relevant permit
conditions, rules, or this chapter.

"Party" means each person or agency
named as party or properly entitled to be a party in any court or agency
proceeding.

"Permit" means written authorization
from the director to construct, modify, and operate any solid waste management
system or any component of any solid waste management system. A permit
authorizes the grantee to construct, modify, and operate any solid waste
management system in a manner or amount, not forbidden by this chapter, or by
rules adopted pursuant to this chapter but requiring review by the department.

"Person" means any individual,
partnership, firm, association, public or private corporation, federal agency,
the State or any of its political subdivisions, trust, estate, or any other
legal entity.

"Petroleum" means any petroleum,
including crude oil or any fraction thereof, that is liquid at standard
temperature and pressure (60 degrees Fahrenheit and 14.7 pounds per square inch
absolute).

"Petroleum-contaminated soil" means
soil that has been contaminated by a release of petroleum to a degree that
exceeds levels determined to be acceptable by the director.

"Pollution" means solid waste
pollution.

"Recycling" means the collection,
separation, recovery, and sale or reuse of secondary resources that would
otherwise be disposed of as municipal solid waste, and is an integral part of a
manufacturing process aimed at producing a marketable product made of
postconsumer material.

"Sanitary landfill" means a land site
on which engineering principles are utilized to bury deposits of solid waste
without creating a nuisance or hazard to public health or safety.

"Secondary resources" means
postconsumer material collected and processed for feedstock in a manufacturing
process.

"Solid waste" means garbage, refuse,
and other discarded materials, including solid, liquid, semisolid, or contained
gaseous materials resulting from industrial, commercial, mining, and
agricultural operations, sludge from waste treatment plants and water supply
treatment plants, and residues from air pollution control facilities and
community activities, but does not include solid or dissolved materials in
domestic sewage or other substances in water sources such as silt, dissolved or
suspended solids in industrial waste water effluents, dissolved materials in
irrigation return flows, or other common water pollutants, or source, special
nuclear, or by-product material as defined by the federal Atomic Energy Act of
1954, as amended (68 Stat. 923).

"Solid waste management system" means
a system for the storage, processing, treatment, transfer, or disposal of solid
waste.

"Variance" means special written
authorization from the director to do an act that deviates from applicable standards
or from the requirements of rules adopted under this chapter.

"Waste" means sewage, industrial and
agricultural matter, and all other liquid, gaseous, or solid substance,
including radioactive substance, whether treated or not, which may pollute or tend
to pollute the atmosphere, lands or waters of this State. [L 1989, c 212, pt of
§4; am L 1990, c 34, §21 and c 298, §6; am L 1992, c 245, §2; am L 1993, c 190,
§5 and c 281, §2; am L 1994, c 210, §3; am L 1997, c 268, §2; am L 1998, c 226,
§1]

Note

The amendment made by L 2014, c 218, §8 is not included in
this section.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next